Maryland, session 2026, SB0512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–802.
(a) In this section:
(1) “stalking” means a malicious course of conduct that includes
approaching or pursuing another where:
(i) the person intends to place or knows or reasonably should have
known the conduct would place another in reasonable fear:
1. A. of serious bodily injury;
B. of an assault in any degree;
C. of rape or sexual offense as defined by §§ 3–303 through
3–308 of this title or attempted rape or sexual offense in any degree;
D. of false imprisonment; or
E. of death; or
2. that a third person likely will suffer any of the acts listed
in item 1 of this item; or
(ii) the person intends to cause or knows or reasonably should have
– 1 –

Ch. 429 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
known that the conduct would cause serious emotional distress to another; and
(2) “stalking” includes conduct described in item (1) of this subsection that
occurs:
(i) in person;
(ii) by electronic communication, as defined in § 3–805 of this
subtitle; or
(iii) through the use of a device that can pinpoint or track the location
of another without the person’s knowledge or consent.
(b) The provisions of this section do not apply to conduct that is:
(1) performed to ensure compliance with a court order;
(2) performed to carry out a specific lawful commercial purpose; or
(3) authorized, required, or protected by local, State, or federal law.
(c) A person may not engage in stalking.
(d) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000
or both.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
AND IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH IF:
(I) THE PERSON HAD AN INTERIM, TEMPORARY, OR FINAL
PROTECTIVE ORDER IN EFFECT AGAINST THE PERSON AT THE TIME OF THE
OFFENSE IN WHICH THE VICTIM WAS THE PETITIONER;
(II) THE PERSON HAD A COURT ORDER IN EFFECT AGAINST THE
PERSON AT THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE PROHIBITING THE BEHAVIOR DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INVOLVING THE VICTIM;
(III) THE PERSON HAS PREVIOUSLY BEEN CONVICTED ONCE OF A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
(IV) THE PERSON PREVIOUSLY HAS BEEN CONVICTED ONCE OF A
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 429
CRIME UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE THAT WOULD BE A CRIME UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IF COMMITTED IN THIS STATE.
(e) A sentence imposed under this section may be separate from and consecutive
to or concurrent with a sentence for any other crime based on the acts establishing a
violation of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –